Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 604.12, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Civil cause of action. A person injured by a violation of subdivision 2 may bring an action for actual damages, punitive damages under sections 549.191 and 549.20 deleted text begin in an amount not to exceed $500deleted text end , injunctive relief, and reasonable attorney fees deleted text begin in an amount not to exceed $500deleted text end .